Hawaii statutes.
§431:13-105 Power of commissioner. The
commissioner may examine and investigate into the affairs of every person
engaged in the business of insurance in this State in order to determine
whether the person has been or is engaged in any unfair method of competition
or in any unfair or deceptive act or practice prohibited by section 431:13-102.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next